Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2413
Judgments for fines and costs; execution in another county or against real estate; filing of transcript in district court.

In every case, whenever it is desirable to obtain execution to be issued to another county, or against the lands or real estate of any person against whom a judgment for fine or costs has been rendered by a magistrate, the magistrate may file with the clerk of the district court of the county wherein such magistrate holds office a transcript of the judgment, whereupon such clerk shall enter the cause upon the register of actions and shall file with the clerk of such court a praecipe and execution to be forthwith issued thereon by such clerk and served in all respects as though the judgment had been rendered in the district court of such county.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 529, p. 839;

R.S.1913, § 9200;

C.S.1922, § 10207;

C.S.1929, § 29-2413;

R.S.1943, § 29-2413;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 61.